src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-3-kîskiswîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # 1Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2SgO: kîskisotâhki # when we play you
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâyâhki # when we play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: kîskiswakihci # when we play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2PlO: kîskisotahkwâwi # when we play you all
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâyâhkwâwi # when we play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: kîskiswakihci # when we play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomâyâhki # when we play another/others

      # 12Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâyahki # when we and you play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: kîskiswahki # when we and you play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâyahkwâwi # when we and you play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: kîskiswahkwayak # when we and you play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomâyahki # when we and you play another/others

      # 2Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO: kîskisoyîko # when you all play me
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâyîko # when you all play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1PlO: kîskisoyîko # when you all play us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâyîkwâwi # when you all play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: kîskiswayîko # when you all play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomâyîko # when you all play another/others

      # 3Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO: kîskisotwâwi # when they play me
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO: kîskisoskwâwi # when they play you
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO: kîskisokoyâhkwâwi # when they play us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: kîskisotahkwâwi # when they play us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO: kîskisokoyahkwâwi # when they play you and us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: kîskisotahkwâwi # when they play you and us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO: kîskisokoyîkwâwi # when they play you all
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: kîskisotîko # when they play you all
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskiswâtwâwi # when they play another/others
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: kîskisomâtwâwi # when they play yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: kîskisomici # when another/others play me
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kîskisomiski # when another/others play you
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: kîskisokoci # when another/others play him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: kîskisokoyâhki # when another/others play us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kîskisokoyahki # when another/others play you and us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kîskisokoyîko # when another/others play you all
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: kîskisokotwâwi # when another/others play them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: kîskiswâthici # when another/others play yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisokothici # when yet another/others play another/others

      # X
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+1SgO: kîskisokawiyâni # when someone plays me
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+2SgO: kîskisokawiyani # when someone plays you
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+3SgO: kîskisohci # when someone plays him/her
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+1PlO: kîskisokawiyâhki # when someone plays us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+12PlO: kîskisokawiyahki # when someone plays you and us
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+2PlO: kîskisokawiyîko # when someone plays you all
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+3PlO: kîskisohtwâwi # when someone plays them
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+X+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomihci # when someone plays another/others
      

      # Imp # Imm

      # 2Sg
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: kîskison # (you) play me now
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: kîskisonân # (you) play us now
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: kîskis # (you) play him/her now
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: kîskisok # (you) play them now

      # 12Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâtân # let you and us play him/her now
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâtânik # let you and us play them now

      # 2Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: kîskisok # (you all) play me now
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO: kîskisonân # (you all) play us now
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: kîskisohk # (you all) play him/her now
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: kîskisohkwâw # (you all) play them now
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: kîskisok # (you all) play them now
      

      # Imp # Del

      # 2Sg
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: kîskisôhkan # (you) play me later
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: kîskisôhkâhk # (you) play us later
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: kîskiswâhkan # (you) play him/her later
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: kîskiswâhkanik # (you) play them later

      # 12Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâhkahk # let you and us play him/her later
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâhkahkik # let you and us play them later
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: kîskiswâhkanik # let you and us play them later

      # 2Pl
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: kîskisôhkîk # (you all) play me later
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO: kîskisôhkâhk # (you all) play us later
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâhkîk # (you all) play him/her later
      kîskiswîw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâhkîkwâw # (you all) play them later
      
